Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1805.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3003.26. Deferred Payment Plan and Installment Plan Penalty, Fine and Fee Freeze.--(a) A taxpayer subject to any tax under this act who has entered into a duly authorized deferred payment plan or installment plan for the taxpayer's past due tax liability may not be charged any additional penalties, fines or fees for the late payment of the taxpayer's 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 tax liability if the taxpayer is making payments in accordance with the terms of the deferred payment plan or installment plan.(b) Entrance into or participation in a duly authorized deferred payment plan or installment plan for the taxpayer's past due tax liability, including an agreement to reinstate a sales and use tax license, shall not preclude the taxpayer from having the right to appeal the taxpayer's past due tax liability.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1805PN2219 - 2 - 123456789